District of Columbia statutes.
29-107.04

Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This title shall modify, limit, and supersede the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, approved June 30, 2000 (114 Stat. 464; 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.), (“Act”), but shall not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of the Act, or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of the Act.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720